Mississippi, session 2026, SB2437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments.  Artificial intelligence systems use machine- and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments; abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and use model inference to formulate options for information or action. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 3, Title 1, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.